Hawaii statutes.
[§334-2.7] Development or
expansion of a forensic facility of the department of health. (a)
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the governor, with the
assistance of the director, may negotiate with any person for the development
or expansion of a forensic facility of the department; provided that if an
environmental assessment or environmental impact statement is required for a
proposed site or for the expansion of the forensic facility under section
343-5, then notwithstanding the time periods specified for public review and
comments under section 343-5, the governor shall accept public comments for a
period of sixty days following public notification of either an environmental
assessment or an environmental impact statement.

(b) Any development or expansion proposal
shall address the construction of the forensic facility separate from the
operation of the facility and shall consider and include:

(1) The percentages of low, medium, and high risk
patients;

(2) The impact of the facility on existing
infrastructure and an assessment of improvements and additions that will be
necessary;

(3) The impact of the facility on available modes of
transportation, including airports, roads, and highways; and

(4) A useful life costs analysis.

(c) For the purposes of this section:

"Forensic facility" means a facility
that assesses and treats forensically committed persons.

"Useful life costs" means an economic
evaluation that compares alternate building and operating methods and provides
information on the design, construction methods, and materials to be used with
respect to efficiency in building maintenance and facility operation. [L 2016,
c 90, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next